Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.13.230

Powers of council.

The council of any code city organized under the council-manager plan provided in this chapter shall have the powers and authority granted to legislative bodies of cities governed by this title as more particularly described in chapter 35A.11 RCW, except insofar as such power and authority is vested in the city manager.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.13.230.]